common.foma
define HatDelete "^" -> 0;

defin StarDelete "*" -> 0;

define Digits [0 | 1 |  2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6];

define DigitsDelete Digits -> 0;

define PercentDelete "%" -> 0;

define BangDelete "!" -> 0;

define WhenInsertE [ q | w | r | t | p | s | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | z | x | c | v | b | n | m | y | i | á | é | í | ó ];

define C [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z];

define V [a | e | i | o | u | á | é | í | ó ];

define Stem [C^<3 V^{1,3} C^<3]+;
